Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1713
Approval; contest; hearing before district court.

If the city council, village board of trustees, or county board of commissioners or supervisors grants approval pursuant to sections 13-1701 to 13-1714 and 76-2,119, a third party other than the applicant who participated in the public hearing may petition the district court of the county in which the proposed site is located within sixty days after the filing of the written decision by the city council, village board, or county board for a hearing to contest the approval. Unless the district court determines that the petition is duplicitous or frivolous, the district court shall hear the petition in accordance with the procedures prescribed in section 13-1712. The burden of proof shall be on the petitioner, and the city council, village board, or county board and the applicant shall be named as correspondents.

The district court shall transmit a copy of its decision to the office of the city council, village board, or county board where it shall be available for public inspection and may be copied upon payment of a fee in an amount equal to the actual cost of reproduction.

Laws 1991, LB 813, § 13.